Kentucky, session 2025RS, HB106.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the Commonwealth of Kentucky:
SECTION 1. A NEW SECTION OF KRS CHAPTER 218A IS CREATED TO
READ AS FOLLOWS:
(1) A person twenty-one (21) years of age or older who knowingly and unlawfully
possesses, traffics, or cultivates a personal use quantity of cannabis shall not be
subject to any penalty for that activity.
(2) Possession, trafficking, or cultivation of a personal use quantity of cannabis
under this section shall not be considered a criminal offense.
(3) No person shall be subject to arrest for possession, trafficking, or cultivation of a
personal use quantity of cannabis.
(4) If a person has been released on probation, parole, conditional release, or other
form of release and is subject to conditions of supervision, then the possession,
trafficking, or cultivation of a personal use quantity of cannabis shall not
constitute grounds for revocation or other sanctions.
Section 2. KRS 218A.010 is amended to read as follows:
As used in this chapter, unless the context otherwise requires:
(1) "Administer" means the direct application of a controlled substance, whether by
injection, inhalation, ingestion, or any other means, to the body of a patient or
research subject by:
(a) A practitioner or by his or her authorized agent under his or her immediate
supervision and pursuant to his or her order; or
(b) The patient or research subject at the direction and in the presence of the
practitioner;
(2) "Anabolic steroid" means any drug or hormonal substance chemically and
pharmacologically related to testosterone that promotes muscle growth and includes
those substances classified as Schedule III controlled substances pursuant to KRS
Page 1 of 34
XXXX 12/26/2024 10:31 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 920
218A.020 but does not include estrogens, progestins, and anticosteroids;
(3) "Cabinet" means the Cabinet for Health and Family Services;
(4) "Cannabis" means all parts of the plant Cannabis sp., whether growing or not;
the seeds thereof; the resin extracted from any part of the plant; and every
compound, manufacture, salt, derivative, mixture, or preparation of the plant, its
seeds or resin, or any compound, mixture, or preparation which contains any
quantity of these substances. The term "cannabis" does not include:
(a) Industrial hemp that is in the possession, custody, or control of a person
who holds a license issued by the Department of Agriculture permitting that
person to cultivate, handle, or process industrial hemp;
(b) Industrial hemp products that do not include any living plants, viable seeds,
or leaf materials;
(c) The substance cannabidiol, when transferred, dispensed, or administered
pursuant to the written order of a physician practicing at a hospital or
associated clinic affiliated with a Kentucky public university having a
college or school of medicine;
(d) For persons participating in a clinical trial or in an expanded access
program, a drug or substance approved for the use of those participants by
the United States Food and Drug Administration;
(e) A cannabidiol product derived from industrial hemp, as defined in KRS
260.850;
(f) For the purpose of conducting scientific research, a cannabinoid product
derived from industrial hemp, as defined in KRS 260.850;
(g) A cannabinoid product approved as a prescription medication by the United
States Food and Drug Administration; or
(h) Medicinal cannabis as defined in KRS 218B.010;
(5) "Cannabis accessory" means drug paraphernalia for the ingestion, inhalation, or
Page 2 of 34
XXXX 12/26/2024 10:31 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 920
storage of a personal use quantity of cannabis;
(6) "Carfentanil" means any substance containing any quantity of carfentanil, or any of
its salts, isomers, or salts of isomers;
(7)[(5)] "Certified community based palliative care program" means a palliative care
program which has received certification from the Joint Commission;
(8)[(6)] "Child" means any person under the age of majority as specified in KRS
2.015;
(9)[(7)] "Cocaine" means a substance containing any quantity of cocaine, its salts,
optical and geometric isomers, and salts of isomers;
(10)[(8)] "Controlled substance" means methamphetamine, or a drug, substance, or
immediate precursor in Schedules I through V and includes a controlled substance
analogue;
(11)[(9)] (a) "Controlled substance analogue," except as provided in paragraph (b) of
this subsection, means a substance:
1. The chemical structure of which is substantially similar to the structure
of a controlled substance in Schedule I or II; and
2. Which has a stimulant, depressant, or hallucinogenic effect on the
central nervous system that is substantially similar to or greater than the
stimulant, depressant, or hallucinogenic effect on the central nervous
system of a controlled substance in Schedule I or II; or
3. With respect to a particular person, which such person represents or
intends to have a stimulant, depressant, or hallucinogenic effect on the
central nervous system that is substantially similar to or greater than the
stimulant, depressant, or hallucinogenic effect on the central nervous
system of a controlled substance in Schedule I or II.
(b) "Controlled substance analogue"[Such term] does not include:
1. Any substance for which there is an approved new drug application;
Page 3 of 34
XXXX 12/26/2024 10:31 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 920
2. With respect to a particular person, any substance if an exemption is in
effect for investigational use for that person pursuant to federal law to
the extent conduct with respect to such substance is pursuant to such
exemption; or
3. Any substance to the extent not intended for human consumption before
the exemption described in subparagraph 2. of this paragraph takes
effect with respect to that substance;
(12)[(10)] "Counterfeit substance" means a controlled substance which, or the container
or labeling of which, without authorization, bears the trademark, trade name, or
other identifying mark, imprint, number, or device, or any likeness thereof, of a
manufacturer, distributor, or dispenser other than the person who in fact
manufactured, distributed, or dispensed the substance;
(13)[(11)] "Dispense" means to deliver a controlled substance to an ultimate user or
research subject by or pursuant to the lawful order of a practitioner, including the
packaging, labeling, or compounding necessary to prepare the substance for that
delivery;
(14)[(12)] "Dispenser" means a person who lawfully dispenses a Schedule II, III, IV, or
V controlled substance to or for the use of an ultimate user;
(15)[(13)] "Distribute" means to deliver other than by administering or dispensing a
controlled substance;
(16)[(14)] "Dosage unit" means a single pill, capsule, ampule, liquid, or other form of
administration available as a single unit;
(17)[(15)] "Drug" means:
(a) Substances recognized as drugs in the official United States Pharmacopoeia,
official Homeopathic Pharmacopoeia of the United States, or official National
Formulary, or any supplement to any of them;
(b) Substances intended for use in the diagnosis, care, mitigation, treatment, or
Page 4 of 34
XXXX 12/26/2024 10:31 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 920
prevention of disease in man or animals;
(c) Substances (other than food) intended to affect the structure or any function of
the body of man or animals; and
(d) Substances intended for use as a component of any article specified in this
subsection.
It does not include devices or their components, parts, or accessories;
(18)[(16)] "Fentanyl" means a substance containing any quantity of fentanyl, or any of
its salts, isomers, or salts of isomers;
(19)[(17)] "Fentanyl derivative" means a substance containing any quantity of any
chemical compound, except compounds specifically scheduled as controlled
substances by statute or by administrative regulation pursuant to this chapter, which
is structurally derived from 1-ethyl-4-(N-phenylamido) piperadine:
(a) By substitution:
1. At the 2-position of the 1-ethyl group with a phenyl, furan, thiophene, or
ethyloxotetrazole ring system; and
2. Of the terminal amido hydrogen atom with an alkyl, alkoxy, cycloalkyl,
or furanyl group; and
(b) Which may be further modified in one (1) or more of the following ways:
1. By substitution on the N-phenyl ring to any extent with alkyl, alkoxy,
haloalkyl, hydroxyl, or halide substituents;
2. By substitution on the piperadine ring to any extent with alkyl, allyl,
alkoxy, hydroxy, or halide substituents at the 2-, 3-, 5-, and/or 6-
positions;
3. By substitution on the piperadine ring to any extent with a phenyl,
alkoxy, or carboxylate ester substituent at the 4- position; or
4. By substitution on the 1-ethyl group to any extent with alkyl, alkoxy, or
hydroxy substituents;
Page 5 of 34
XXXX 12/26/2024 10:31 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 920
(20)[(18)] "Good-faith prior examination," as used in KRS Chapter 218A and for
criminal prosecution only, means an in-person medical examination of the patient
conducted by the prescribing practitioner or other health-care professional routinely
relied upon in the ordinary course of his or her practice, at which time the patient is
physically examined and a medical history of the patient is obtained. "In-person"
includes telehealth examinations. This subsection shall not be applicable to hospice
providers licensed pursuant to KRS Chapter 216B;
(21)[(19)] "Hazardous chemical substance" includes any chemical substance used or
intended for use in the illegal manufacture of a controlled substance as defined in
this section or the illegal manufacture of methamphetamine as defined in KRS
218A.1431, which:
(a) Poses an explosion hazard;
(b) Poses a fire hazard; or
(c) Is poisonous or injurious if handled, swallowed, or inhaled;
(22)[(20)] "Heroin" means a substance containing any quantity of heroin, or any of its
salts, isomers, or salts of isomers;
(23)[(21)] "Hydrocodone combination product" means a drug with:
(a) Not more than three hundred (300) milligrams of dihydrocodeinone, or any of
its salts, per one hundred (100) milliliters or not more than fifteen (15)
milligrams per dosage unit, with a fourfold or greater quantity of an
isoquinoline alkaloid of opium; or
(b) Not more than three hundred (300) milligrams of dihydrocodeinone, or any of
its salts, per one hundred (100) milliliters or not more than fifteen (15)
milligrams per dosage unit, with one (1) or more active, nonnarcotic
ingredients in recognized therapeutic amounts;
(24)[(22)] "Immediate precursor" means a substance which is the principal compound
commonly used or produced primarily for use, and which is an immediate chemical
Page 6 of 34
XXXX 12/26/2024 10:31 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 920
intermediary used or likely to be used in the manufacture of a controlled substance
or methamphetamine, the control of which is necessary to prevent, curtail, or limit
manufacture;
(25)[(23)] "Industrial hemp" has the same meaning as in KRS 260.850;
(26)[(24)] "Industrial hemp products" has the same meaning as in KRS 260.850;
(27)[(25)] "Intent to manufacture" means any evidence which demonstrates a person's
conscious objective to manufacture a controlled substance or methamphetamine.
Such evidence includes but is not limited to statements and a chemical substance's
usage, quantity, manner of storage, or proximity to other chemical substances or
equipment used to manufacture a controlled substance or methamphetamine;
(28)[(26)] "Isomer" means the optical isomer, except the Cabinet for Health and Family
Services may include the optical, positional, or geometric isomer to classify any
substance pursuant to KRS 218A.020;
(29)[(27)] "Manufacture," except as provided in KRS 218A.1431, means the production,
preparation, propagation, compounding, conversion, or processing of a controlled
substance, either directly or indirectly by extraction from substances of natural
origin or independently by means of chemical synthesis, or by a combination of
extraction and chemical synthesis, and includes any packaging or repackaging of
the substance or labeling or relabeling of its container except that this term does not
include activities:
(a) By a practitioner as an incident to his or her administering or dispensing of a
controlled substance in the course of his or her professional practice;
(b) By a practitioner, or by his or her authorized agent under his or her
supervision, for the purpose of, or as an incident to, research, teaching, or
chemical analysis and not for sale; or
(c) By a pharmacist as an incident to his or her dispensing of a controlled
substance in the course of his or her professional practice;
Page 7 of 34
XXXX 12/26/2024 10:31 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 920
(30)[(28)] "Marijuana" has the same meaning as "cannabis" in subsection (4) of this
section[means all parts of the plant Cannabis sp., whether growing or not; the seeds
thereof; the resin extracted from any part of the plant; and every compound,
manufacture, salt, derivative, mixture, or preparation of the plant, its seeds or resin
or any compound, mixture, or preparation which contains any quantity of these
substances. The term "marijuana" does not include:
(a) Industrial hemp that is in the possession, custody, or control of a person who
holds a license issued by the Department of Agriculture permitting that person
to cultivate, handle, or process industrial hemp;
(b) Industrial hemp products that do not include any living plants, viable seeds,
leaf materials, or floral materials;
(c) The substance cannabidiol, when transferred, dispensed, or administered
pursuant to the written order of a physician practicing at a hospital or
associated clinic affiliated with a Kentucky public university having a college
or school of medicine;
(d) For persons participating in a clinical trial or in an expanded access program,
a drug or substance approved for the use of those participants by the United
States Food and Drug Administration;
(e) A cannabidiol product derived from industrial hemp, as defined in KRS
260.850;
(f) For the purpose of conducting scientific research, a cannabinoid product
derived from industrial hemp, as defined in KRS 260.850;
(g) A cannabinoid product approved as a prescription medication by the United
States Food and Drug Administration; or
(h) Medicinal cannabis as defined in KRS 218B.010];
(31)[(29)] "Medical history," as used in KRS Chapter 218A and for criminal prosecution
only, means an accounting of a patient's medical background, including but not
Page 8 of 34
XXXX 12/26/2024 10:31 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 920
limited to prior medical conditions, prescriptions, and family background;
(32)[(30)] "Medical order," as used in KRS Chapter 218A and for criminal prosecution
only, means a lawful order of a specifically identified practitioner for a specifically
identified patient for the patient's health-care needs. "Medical order" may or may
not include a prescription drug order;
(33)[(31)] "Medical record," as used in KRS Chapter 218A and for criminal prosecution
only, means a record, other than for financial or billing purposes, relating to a
patient, kept by a practitioner as a result of the practitioner-patient relationship;
(34)[(32)] "Methamphetamine" means any substance that contains any quantity of
methamphetamine, or any of its salts, isomers, or salts of isomers;
(35)[(33)] "Narcotic drug" means any of the following, whether produced directly or
indirectly by extraction from substances of vegetable origin, or independently by
means of chemical synthesis, or by a combination of extraction and chemical
synthesis:
(a) Opium and opiate, and any salt, compound, derivative, or preparation of
opium or opiate;
(b) Any salt, compound, isomer, derivative, or preparation thereof which is
chemically equivalent or identical with any of the substances referred to in
paragraph (a) of this subsection, but not including the isoquinoline alkaloids
of opium;
(c) Opium poppy and poppy straw;
(d) Coca leaves, except coca leaves and extracts of coca leaves from which
cocaine, ecgonine, and derivatives of ecgonine or their salts have been
removed;
(e) Cocaine, its salts, optical and geometric isomers, and salts of isomers;
(f) Ecgonine, its derivatives, their salts, isomers, and salts of isomers; and
(g) Any compound, mixture, or preparation which contains any quantity of any of
Page 9 of 34
XXXX 12/26/2024 10:31 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 920
the substances referred to in paragraphs (a) to (f) of this subsection;
(36)[(34)] "Opiate" means any substance having an addiction-forming or addiction-
sustaining liability similar to morphine or being capable of conversion into a drug
having addiction-forming or addiction-sustaining liability. It does not include,
unless specifically designated as controlled under KRS 218A.020, the
dextrorotatory isomer of 3-methoxy-n-methylmorphinan and its salts
(dextromethorphan). It does include its racemic and levorotatory forms;
(37)[(35)] "Opium poppy" means the plant of the species papaver somniferum L., except
its seeds;
(38)[(36)] "Person" means individual, corporation, government or governmental
subdivision or agency, business trust, estate, trust, partnership or association, or any
other legal entity;
(39) "Personal use quantity of cannabis" means:
(a) One (1) ounce or less of cannabis in plant form;
(b) Five (5) grams or less of resin or concentrates derived from hemp,
cannabis, or cannabanoids, excluding the estimated weight of any
noncannabis ingredients combined with the cannabis;
(c) Cannabis products containing one thousand (1,000) milligrams or less of
delta-9 tetrahydrocannabinol and one thousand (1,000) milligrams or less
of delta-8 tetrahydrocannabinol; or
(d) Five (5) or fewer plants of cannabis;
(40)[(37)] "Physical injury" has the same meaning as[it has] in KRS 500.080;
(41)[(38)] "Poppy straw" means all parts, except the seeds, of the opium poppy, after
mowing;
(42)[(39)] "Pharmacist" means a natural person licensed by this state to engage in the
practice of the profession of pharmacy;
(43)[(40)] "Practitioner" means a physician, dentist, podiatrist, veterinarian, scientific
Page 10 of 34
XXXX 12/26/2024 10:31 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 920
investigator, optometrist as authorized in KRS 320.240, advanced practice
registered nurse as authorized under KRS 314.011, physician assistant as authorized
under KRS 311.858, or other person licensed, registered, or otherwise permitted by
state or federal law to acquire, distribute, dispense, conduct research with respect to,
or to administer a controlled substance in the course of professional practice or
research in this state. "Practitioner" also includes a physician, dentist, podiatrist,
veterinarian, or advanced practice registered nurse authorized under KRS 314.011
who is a resident of and actively practicing in a state other than Kentucky and who
is licensed and has prescriptive authority for controlled substances under the
professional licensing laws of another state, unless the person's Kentucky license
has been revoked, suspended, restricted, or probated, in which case the terms of the
Kentucky license shall prevail;
(44)[(41)] "Practitioner-patient relationship," as used in KRS Chapter 218A and for
criminal prosecution only, means a medical relationship that exists between a
patient and a practitioner or the practitioner's designee, after the practitioner or his
or her designee has conducted at least one (1) good-faith prior examination;
(45)[(42)] "Prescription" means a written, electronic, or oral order for a drug or
medicine, or combination or mixture of drugs or medicines, or proprietary
preparation, signed or given or authorized by a medical, dental, chiropody,
veterinarian, optometric practitioner, or advanced practice registered nurse, and
intended for use in the diagnosis, cure, mitigation, treatment, or prevention of
disease in man or other animals;
(46)[(43)] "Prescription blank," with reference to a controlled substance, means a
document that meets the requirements of KRS 218A.204 and 217.216;
(47)[(44)] "Presumptive probation" means a sentence of probation not to exceed the
maximum term specified for the offense, subject to conditions otherwise authorized
by law, that is presumed to be the appropriate sentence for certain offenses
Page 11 of 34
XXXX 12/26/2024 10:31 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 920
designated in this chapter, notwithstanding contrary provisions of KRS Chapter
533. That presumption shall only be overcome by a finding on the record by the
sentencing court of substantial and compelling reasons why the defendant cannot be
safely and effectively supervised in the community, is not amenable to community-
based treatment, or poses a significant risk to public safety;
(48)[(45)] "Production" includes the manufacture, planting, cultivation, growing, or
harvesting of a controlled substance;
(49)[(46)] "Recovery program" means an evidence-based, nonclinical service that assists
individuals and families working toward sustained recovery from substance use and
other criminal risk factors. This can be done through an array of support programs
and services that are delivered through residential and nonresidential means;
(50)[(47)] "Salvia" means Salvia divinorum or Salvinorin A and includes all parts of the
plant presently classified botanically as Salvia divinorum, whether growing or not,
the seeds thereof, any extract from any part of that plant, and every compound,
manufacture, derivative, mixture, or preparation of that plant, its seeds, or its
extracts, including salts, isomers, and salts of isomers whenever the existence of
such salts, isomers, and salts of isomers is possible within the specific chemical
designation of that plant, its seeds, or extracts. The term shall not include any other
species in the genus salvia;
(51)[(48)] "Second or subsequent offense" means that for the purposes of this chapter an
offense is considered as a second or subsequent offense, if, prior to his or her
conviction of the offense, the offender has at any time been convicted under this
chapter, or under any statute of the United States, or of any state relating to
substances classified as controlled substances or counterfeit substances, except that
a prior conviction for a nontrafficking offense shall be treated as a prior offense
only when the subsequent offense is a nontrafficking offense. For the purposes of
this section, a conviction voided under KRS 218A.275 or 218A.276 shall not
Page 12 of 34
XXXX 12/26/2024 10:31 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 920
constitute a conviction under this chapter;
(52)[(49)] "Sell" means to dispose of a controlled substance to another person for
consideration or in furtherance of commercial distribution;
(53)[(50)] "Serious physical injury" has the same meaning as[it has] in KRS 500.080;
(54)[(51)] "Synthetic cannabinoids or piperazines" means any chemical compound
which is not approved by the United States Food and Drug Administration or, if
approved, which is not dispensed or possessed in accordance with state and federal
law, that contains Benzylpiperazine (BZP); Trifluoromethylphenylpiperazine
(TFMPP); 1,1-Dimethylheptyl-11-hydroxytetrahydrocannabinol (HU-210); 1-
Butyl-3-(1-naphthoyl)indole; 1-Pentyl-3-(1-naphthoyl)indole; dexanabinol (HU-
211); or any compound in the following structural classes:
(a) Naphthoylindoles: Any compound containing a 3-(1-naphthoyl)indole
structure with substitution at the nitrogen atom of the indole ring by an alkyl,
haloalkyl, alkenyl, cycloalkylmethyl, cycloalkylethyl, 1-(N-methyl-2-
piperidinyl)methyl, or 2-(4-morpholinyl)ethyl group, whether or not further
substituted in the indole ring to any extent and whether or not substituted in
the naphthyl ring to any extent. Examples of this structural class include but
are not limited to JWH-015, JWH-018, JWH-019, JWH-073, JWH-081, JWH-
122, JWH-200, and AM-2201;
(b) Phenylacetylindoles: Any compound containing a 3-phenylacetylindole
structure with substitution at the nitrogen atom of the indole ring by an alkyl,
haloalkyl, alkenyl, cycloalkylmethyl, cycloalkylethyl, 1-(N-methyl-2-
piperidinyl)methyl, or 2-(4-morpholinyl)ethyl group whether or not further
substituted in the indole ring to any extent and whether or not substituted in
the phenyl ring to any extent. Examples of this structural class include but are
not limited to JWH-167, JWH-250, JWH-251, and RCS-8;
(c) Benzoylindoles: Any compound containing a 3-(benzoyl)indole structure with
Page 13 of 34
XXXX 12/26/2024 10:31 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 920
substitution at the nitrogen atom of the indole ring by an alkyl, haloalkyl,
alkenyl, cycloalkylmethyl, cycloalkylethyl, 1-(N-methyl-2-
piperidinyl)methyl, or 2-(4-morpholinyl)ethyl group whether or not further
substituted in the indole ring to any extent and whether or not substituted in
the phenyl ring to any extent. Examples of this structural class include but are
not limited to AM-630, AM-2233, AM-694, Pravadoline (WIN 48,098), and
RCS-4;
(d) Cyclohexylphenols: Any compound containing a 2-(3-
hydroxycyclohexyl)phenol structure with substitution at the 5-position of the
phenolic ring by an alkyl, haloalkyl, alkenyl, cycloalkylmethyl,
cycloalkylethyl, 1-(N-methyl-2-piperidinyl)methyl, or 2-(4-morpholinyl)ethyl
group whether or not substituted in the cyclohexyl ring to any extent.
Examples of this structural class include but are not limited to CP 47,497 and
its C8 homologue (cannabicyclohexanol);
(e) Naphthylmethylindoles: Any compound containing a 1H-indol-3-yl-(1-
naphthyl)methane structure with substitution at the nitrogen atom of the
indole ring by an alkyl, haloalkyl, alkenyl, cycloalkylmethyl, cycloalkylethyl,
1-(N-methyl-2-piperidinyl)methyl, or 2-(4-morpholinyl)ethyl group whether
or not further substituted in the indole ring to any extent and whether or not
substituted in the naphthyl ring to any extent. Examples of this structural class
include but are not limited to JWH-175, JWH-184, and JWH-185;
(f) Naphthoylpyrroles: Any compound containing a 3-(1-naphthoyl)pyrrole
structure with substitution at the nitrogen atom of the pyrrole ring by an alkyl,
haloalkyl, alkenyl, cycloalkylmethyl, cycloalkylethyl, 1-(N-methyl-2-
piperidinyl)methyl, or 2-(4-morpholinyl)ethyl group whether or not further
substituted in the pyrrole ring to any extent and whether or not substituted in
the naphthyl ring to any extent. Examples of this structural class include but
Page 14 of 34
XXXX 12/26/2024 10:31 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 920
are not limited to JWH-030, JWH-145, JWH-146, JWH-307, and JWH-368;
(g) Naphthylmethylindenes: Any compound containing a 1-(1-
naphthylmethyl)indene structure with substitution at the 3-position of the
indene ring by an alkyl, haloalkyl, alkenyl, cycloalkylmethyl, cycloalkylethyl,
1-(N-methyl-2-piperidinyl)methyl, or 2-(4-morpholinyl)ethyl group whether
or not further substituted in the indene ring to any extent and whether or not
substituted in the naphthyl ring to any extent. Examples of this structural class
include but are not limited to JWH-176;
(h) Tetramethylcyclopropanoylindoles: Any compound containing a 3-(1-
tetramethylcyclopropoyl)indole structure with substitution at the nitrogen
atom of the indole ring by an alkyl, haloalkyl, cycloalkylmethyl,
cycloalkylethyl, 1-(N-methyl-2-piperidinyl)methyl, or 2-(4-morpholinyl)ethyl
group, whether or not further substituted in the indole ring to any extent and
whether or not further substituted in the tetramethylcyclopropyl ring to any
extent. Examples of this structural class include but are not limited to UR-144
and XLR-11;
(i) Adamantoylindoles: Any compound containing a 3-(1-adamantoyl)indole
structure with substitution at the nitrogen atom of the indole ring by an alkyl,
haloalkyl, alkenyl, cycloalkylmethyl, cycloalkylethyl, 1-(N-methyl-2-
piperidinyl)methyl, or 2-(4-morpholinyl)ethyl group, whether or not further
substituted in the indole ring to any extent and whether or not substituted in
the adamantyl ring system to any extent. Examples of this structural class
include but are not limited to AB-001 and AM-1248; or
(j) Any other synthetic cannabinoid or piperazine which is not approved by the
United States Food and Drug Administration or, if approved, which is not
dispensed or possessed in accordance with state and federal law;
(55)[(52)] "Synthetic cathinones" means any chemical compound which is not approved
Page 15 of 34
XXXX 12/26/2024 10:31 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 920
by the United States Food and Drug Administration or, if approved, which is not
dispensed or possessed in accordance with state and federal law (not including
bupropion or compounds listed under a different schedule) structurally derived from
2-aminopropan-1-one by substitution at the 1-position with either phenyl, naphthyl,
or thiophene ring systems, whether or not the compound is further modified in one
(1) or more of the following ways:
(a) By substitution in the ring system to any extent with alkyl, alkylenedioxy,
alkoxy, haloalkyl, hydroxyl, or halide substituents, whether or not further
substituted in the ring system by one (1) or more other univalent substituents.
Examples of this class include but are not limited to 3,4-
Methylenedioxycathinone (bk-MDA);
(b) By substitution at the 3-position with an acyclic alkyl substituent. Examples
of this class include but are not limited to 2-methylamino-1-phenylbutan-1-
one (buphedrone);
(c) By substitution at the 2-amino nitrogen atom with alkyl, dialkyl, benzyl, or
methoxybenzyl groups, or by inclusion of the 2-amino nitrogen atom in a
cyclic structure. Examples of this class include but are not limited to
Dimethylcathinone, Ethcathinone, and -Pyrrolidinopropiophenone (-PPP);
or
(d) Any other synthetic cathinone which is not approved by the United States
Food and Drug Administration or, if approved, is not dispensed or possessed
in accordance with state or federal law;
(56)[(53)] "Synthetic drugs" means any synthetic cannabinoids or piperazines or any
synthetic cathinones;
(57)[(54)] "Telehealth" has the same meaning as[it has] in KRS 211.332;
(58)[(55)] "Tetrahydrocannabinols" means synthetic equivalents of the substances
contained in the plant, or in the resinous extractives of the plant Cannabis, sp. or
Page 16 of 34
XXXX 12/26/2024 10:31 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 920
synthetic substances, derivatives, and their isomers with similar chemical structure
and pharmacological activity such as the following:
(a) Delta 1 cis or trans tetrahydrocannabinol, and their optical isomers;
(b) Delta 6 cis or trans tetrahydrocannabinol, and their optical isomers; and
(c) Delta 3, 4 cis or trans tetrahydrocannabinol, and its optical isomers;
(59)[(56)] "Traffic," except as provided in KRS 218A.1431, means to manufacture,
distribute, dispense, sell, transfer, or possess with intent to manufacture, distribute,
dispense, or sell a controlled substance;
(60)[(57)] "Transfer" means to dispose of a controlled substance to another person
without consideration and not in furtherance of commercial distribution; and
(61)[(58)] "Ultimate user" means a person who lawfully possesses a controlled substance
for his or her own use or for the use of a member of his or her household or for
administering to an animal owned by him or her or by a member of his or her
household.
Section 3. KRS 218A.1422 is amended to read as follows:
(1) A person is guilty of possession of cannabis[marijuana] when he or she knowingly
and unlawfully possesses cannabis[marijuana], and the possession is not in
compliance with, or otherwise authorized by, KRS Chapter 218B.
(2) Possession of cannabis[marijuana] is a Class B misdemeanor, except that, KRS
Chapter 532 to the contrary notwithstanding, the maximum term of incarceration
shall be no greater than forty-five (45) days.
(3) This section does not apply to:
(a) A cannabis business or a cannabis business agent, as defined in KRS
218B.010, when acting in compliance with KRS Chapter 218B; [or]
(b) A cardholder, as defined in KRS 218B.010, whose use of medicinal cannabis
is in compliance with KRS Chapter 218B; or
(c) A person who possesses a personal use quantity of cannabis.
Page 17 of 34
XXXX 12/26/2024 10:31 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 920
Section 4. KRS 218A.1421 is amended to read as follows:
(1) A person is guilty of trafficking in cannabis[marijuana] when he or she knowingly
and unlawfully traffics in cannabis[marijuana], and the trafficking is not in
compliance with, or otherwise authorized by, KRS Chapter 218B.
(2) Unless authorized by KRS Chapter 218B, trafficking in less than eight (8) ounces of
cannabis[marijuana] is:
(a) For a first offense a Class A misdemeanor; and[.]
(b) For a second or subsequent offense a Class D felony.
(3) Unless authorized by KRS Chapter 218B, trafficking in eight (8) or more ounces
but less than five (5) pounds of cannabis[marijuana] is:
(a) For a first offense a Class D felony; and[.]
(b) For a second or subsequent offense a Class C felony.
(4) Unless authorized by KRS Chapter 218B, trafficking in five (5) or more pounds of
cannabis[marijuana] is:
(a) For a first offense a Class C felony; and[.]
(b) For a second or subsequent offense a Class B felony.
(5) Unless authorized by KRS Chapter 218B, the unlawful possession by any person of
eight (8) or more ounces of cannabis[marijuana] shall be prima facie evidence that
the person possessed the cannabis[marijuana] with the intent to sell or transfer it.
(6) This section does not apply to:
(a) A cannabis business or a cannabis business agent, as defined in KRS
218B.010, when acting in compliance with KRS Chapter 218B; [or]
(b) A cardholder, as defined in KRS 218B.010, whose use of medicinal cannabis
is in compliance with KRS Chapter 218B; or
(c) A person who traffics a personal use quantity of cannabis.
Section 5. KRS 218A.1423 is amended to read as follows:
(1) A person is guilty of cannabis[marijuana] cultivation when he or she knowingly
Page 18 of 34
XXXX 12/26/2024 10:31 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 920
and unlawfully plants, cultivates, or harvests cannabis[marijuana] with the intent to
sell or transfer it, and the cultivation is not in compliance with, or otherwise
authorized by, KRS Chapter 218B.
(2) Unless authorized by KRS Chapter 218B, cannabis[marijuana] cultivation of five
(5) or more plants of cannabis[marijuana] is:
(a) For a first offense a Class D felony; and[.]
(b) For a second or subsequent offense a Class C felony.
(3) [Unless authorized by KRS Chapter 218B, marijuana ]Cultivation of a personal
use quantity of cannabis shall not:
(a) Be subject to any penalty;
(b) Be considered a criminal offense; or
(c) Subject a person to arrest for cannabis cultivation[fewer than five (5) plants
is:
(a) For a first offense a Class A misdemeanor.
(b) For a second or subsequent offense a Class D felony].
(4) Unless authorized by KRS Chapter 218B, the planting, cultivating, or harvesting of
more than five (5)[ or more] cannabis[marijuana] plants shall be prima facie
evidence that the cannabis[marijuana] plants were planted, cultivated, or harvested
for the purpose of sale or transfer.
(5) This section does not apply to:
(a) A cannabis business or a cannabis business agent, as defined in KRS
218B.010, when acting in compliance with KRS Chapter 218B; or
(b) A person who cultivates a personal use quantity of cannabis.
Section 6. KRS 218A.500 is amended to read as follows:
As used in this section and KRS 218A.510:
(1) "Drug paraphernalia" means all equipment, products and materials of any kind
which are used, intended for use, or designed for use in planting, propagating,
Page 19 of 34
XXXX 12/26/2024 10:31 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 920
cultivating, growing, harvesting, manufacturing, compounding, converting,
producing, processing, preparing, testing, analyzing, packaging, repackaging,
storing, containing, concealing, injecting, ingesting, inhaling, or otherwise
introducing into the human body a controlled substance in violation of this chapter.
The term "drug paraphernalia" does not include medicinal cannabis accessories as
defined in KRS 218B.010. It includes but is not limited to:
(a) Kits used, intended for use, or designed for use in planting, propagating,
cultivating, growing, or harvesting of any species of plant which is a
controlled substance or from which a controlled substance can be derived;
(b) Kits used, intended for use, or designed for use in manufacturing,
compounding, converting, producing, processing, or preparing controlled
substances;
(c) Isomerization devices used, intended for use, or designed for use in increasing
the potency of any species of plant which is a controlled substance;
(d) Except as provided in subsection (7) of this section, testing equipment used,
intended for use, or designed for use in analyzing the strength, effectiveness,
or purity of controlled substances;
(e) Scales and balances used, intended for use, or designed for use in weighing or
measuring controlled substances;
(f) Diluents and adulterants, such as quinine hydrochloride, mannitol, mannite,
dextrose and lactose, used, intended for use, or designed for use in cutting
controlled substances;
(g) Separation gins and sifters used, intended for use, or designed for use in
removing twigs and seeds from, or in otherwise cleaning or refining
cannabis[marijuana];
(h) Blenders, bowls, containers, spoons, and mixing devices used, intended for
use, or designed for use in compounding controlled substances;
Page 20 of 34
XXXX 12/26/2024 10:31 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 920
(i) Capsules, balloons, envelopes, and other containers used, intended for use, or
designed for use in packaging small quantities of controlled substances;
(j) Containers and other objects used, intended for use, or designed for use in
storing or concealing controlled substances;
(k) Hypodermic syringes, needles, and other objects used, intended for use, or
designed for use in parenterally injecting controlled substances into the human
body; and
(l) Objects used, intended for use, or designed for use in ingesting, inhaling, or
otherwise introducing cannabis[marijuana], cocaine, hashish, or hashish oil
into the human body, such as: metal, wooden, acrylic, glass, stone, plastic, or
ceramic pipes with or without screens, permanent screens, hashish heads, or
punctured metal bowls; water pipes; carburetion tubes and devices; smoking
and carburetion masks; roach clips which mean objects used to hold burning
material, such as cannabis[marijuana] cigarettes, that have become too small
or too short to be held in the hand; miniature cocaine spoons, and cocaine
vials; chamber pipes; carburetor pipes; electric pipes; air-driven pipes;
chillums; bongs; ice pipes or chillers.
(2) Except for cannabis accessories, it is unlawful for any person to use, or to possess
with intent to use, drug paraphernalia for the purpose of planting, propagating,
cultivating, growing, harvesting, manufacturing, compounding, converting,
producing, processing, preparing, testing, analyzing, packing, repacking, storing,
containing, concealing, injecting, ingesting, inhaling, or otherwise introducing into
the human body a controlled substance in violation of this chapter.
(3) Except for cannabis accessories, it is unlawful for any person to deliver, possess
with intent to deliver, or manufacture with intent to deliver, drug paraphernalia,
knowing, or under circumstances where one reasonably should know, that it will be
used to plant, propagate, cultivate, grow, harvest, manufacture, compound, convert,
Page 21 of 34
XXXX 12/26/2024 10:31 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 920
produce, process, prepare, test, analyze, pack, repack, store, contain, conceal, inject,
ingest, inhale, or otherwise introduce into the human body a controlled substance in
violation of this chapter.
(4) It is unlawful for any person to place in any newspaper, magazine, handbill, or
other publication any advertisement, knowing, or under circumstances where one
reasonably should know, that the purpose of the advertisement, in whole or in part,
is to promote the sale of objects designed or intended for use as drug paraphernalia.
(5) (a) This section shall not prohibit a local health department from operating a
substance abuse treatment outreach program which allows participants to
exchange hypodermic needles and syringes.
(b) To operate a substance abuse treatment outreach program under this
subsection, the local health department shall have the consent, which may be
revoked at any time, of the local board of health and:
1. The legislative body of the first or home rule class city in which the
program would operate if located in such a city; and
2. The legislative body of the county, urban-county government, or
consolidated local government in which the program would operate.
(c) Items exchanged at the program shall not be deemed drug paraphernalia under
this section while located at the program.
(6) (a) Prior to searching a person, a person's premises, or a person's vehicle, a peace
officer may inquire as to the presence of needles or other sharp objects in the
areas to be searched that may cut or puncture the officer and offer to not
charge a person with possession of drug paraphernalia if the person declares
to the officer the presence of the needle or other sharp object. If, in response
to the offer, the person admits to the presence of the needle or other sharp
object prior to the search, the person shall not be charged with or prosecuted
for possession of drug paraphernalia for the needle or sharp object or for
Page 22 of 34
XXXX 12/26/2024 10:31 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 920
possession of a controlled substance for residual or trace drug amounts
present on the needle or sharp object.
(b) The exemption under this subsection shall not apply to any other drug
paraphernalia that may be present and found during the search or to controlled
substances present in other than residual or trace amounts.
(7) (a) This section shall not prohibit the retail sale of hypodermic syringes and
needles without a prescription in pharmacies.
(b) Hypodermic syringe and needle inventory of a pharmacy shall not be deemed
drug paraphernalia under this section.
(c) 1. Except as provided in subparagraph 2. of this paragraph, narcotic drug
testing products utilized in determining whether a controlled substance
contains a synthetic opioid or its analogues shall not be deemed drug
paraphernalia under this section.
2. A narcotic drug testing product that is utilized in conjunction with the
importation, manufacture, or selling of fentanyl or a fentanyl analogue
in violation of this chapter shall be deemed drug paraphernalia under
this section.
(d) Notwithstanding any other statute to the contrary, possession of a narcotic
drug testing product used in accordance with paragraph (c)1. of this
subsection that contains residual or trace amounts of a synthetic opioid or an
analogue thereof shall not be prosecuted as possession of a controlled
substance under any provision of this chapter.
(8) Any person who violates any provision of this section shall be guilty of a Class A
misdemeanor.
Section 7. KRS 218A.410 is amended to read as follows:
(1) The following are subject to forfeiture:
(a) Controlled substances listed in Schedule I that are possessed, transferred, sold,
Page 23 of 34
XXXX 12/26/2024 10:31 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 920
or offered for sale in violation of this chapter are contraband and shall be
seized and summarily forfeited to the state;
(b) Controlled substances listed in Schedule I, which are seized or come into the
possession of the state, the owners of which are unknown, are contraband and
shall be summarily forfeited to the state;
(c) Species of plants from which controlled substances in Schedules I and II may
be derived which have been planted or cultivated in violation of this chapter,
or of which the owners or cultivators are unknown, or which are wild
growths, may be seized and summarily destroyed or forfeited to the state. The
failure, upon demand by the law enforcement agency or its authorized agent,
of the person in occupancy or in control of land or premises upon which the
species of plants are growing or being stored, to produce an appropriate
registration, or proof that he or she is the holder thereof, constitutes authority
for the seizure and forfeiture of the plants;
(d) All substances, machinery, or devices used for the manufacture, packaging,
repackaging, or marking, and books, papers, and records, and all vehicles
owned and used by the seller or distributor for the manufacture, distribution,
sale, or transfer of substances in violation of KRS 218A.350 shall be seized
and forfeited to the state. Substances manufactured, held, or distributed in
violation of KRS 218A.350 shall be deemed contraband;
(e) All controlled substances which have been manufactured, distributed,
dispensed, possessed, being held, or acquired in violation of this chapter;
(f) All raw materials, products, and equipment of any kind which are used, or
intended for use, in manufacturing, compounding, processing, delivering,
importing, or exporting any controlled substance in violation of this chapter;
(g) All property which is used, or intended for use, as a container for property
described in paragraph (e) or (f) of this subsection;
Page 24 of 34
XXXX 12/26/2024 10:31 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 920
(h) All conveyances, including aircraft, vehicles, or vessels, which are used, or
intended for use, to transport, or in any manner to facilitate the transportation,
for the purpose of sale or receipt of property described in paragraph (e) or (f)
of this subsection, but:
1. No conveyance used by any person as a common carrier in the
transaction of business as a common carrier is subject to forfeiture under
this section unless it is proven beyond a reasonable doubt that the owner
or other person in charge of the conveyance is a consenting party or
privy to a violation of this chapter;
2. No conveyance is subject to forfeiture under this section by reason of
any act or omission established by the owner thereof to have been
committed or omitted without his or her knowledge or consent;
3. A forfeiture of a conveyance encumbered by a bona fide security
interest is subject to the interest of the secured party if he or she neither
had knowledge of nor consented to the act or omission; and
4. The forfeiture provisions of this paragraph shall not apply to any
misdemeanor offense relating to cannabis[marijuana] or salvia;
(i) All books, records, and research products and materials, including formulas,
microfilm, tapes, and data which are used, or intended for use, in violation of
this chapter;
(j) Everything of value furnished, or intended to be furnished, in exchange for a
controlled substance in violation of this chapter, all proceeds, including real
and personal property, traceable to the exchange, and all moneys, negotiable
instruments, and securities used, or intended to be used, to facilitate any
violation of this chapter; except that no property shall be forfeited under this
paragraph, to the extent of the interest of an owner, by reason of any act or
omission established by him or her to have been committed or omitted
Page 25 of 34
XXXX 12/26/2024 10:31 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 920
without his or her knowledge or consent. It shall be a rebuttable presumption
that all moneys, coin, and currency found in close proximity to controlled
substances, to drug manufacturing or distributing paraphernalia, or to records
of the importation, manufacture, or distribution of controlled substances, are
presumed to be forfeitable under this paragraph. The burden of proof shall be
upon claimants of personal property to rebut this presumption by clear and
convincing evidence. The burden of proof shall be upon the law enforcement
agency to prove by clear and convincing evidence that real property is
forfeitable under this paragraph; and
(k) All real property, including any right, title, and interest in the whole of any lot
or tract of land and any appurtenances or improvements, which is used or
intended to be used, in any manner or part, to commit, or to facilitate the
commission of, a violation of this chapter excluding any misdemeanor offense
relating to cannabis[marijuana], synthetic drugs, or salvia, except that
property shall be forfeited under this paragraph, to the extent of an interest of
an owner, by reason of any act or omission established by the Commonwealth
to have been committed or omitted with the knowledge or consent of the
owner.
(2) Title to all property, including all interests in the property, forfeit under this section
vests in the Commonwealth on the commission of the act or omission giving rise to
forfeiture under this section together with the proceeds of the property after the
time. Any property or proceeds subsequently transferred to any person shall be
subject to forfeiture and thereafter shall be ordered forfeited, unless the transferee
establishes in the forfeiture proceeding that he or she is a subsequent bona fide
purchaser for value without actual or constructive notice of the act or omission
giving rise to the forfeiture.
(3) If any of the property described in this section cannot be located; has been
Page 26 of 34
XXXX 12/26/2024 10:31 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 920
transferred to, sold to, or deposited with a third party; has been placed beyond the
jurisdiction of the court; has been substantially diminished in value by any act or
omission of the defendant; or, has been commingled with any property which
cannot be divided without difficulty, the court shall order the forfeiture of any other
property of the defendant up to the value of any property subject to forfeiture under
this section.
(4) The forfeiture provisions of this section shall not apply to a personal use quantity
of cannabis.
Section 8. KRS 533.030 is amended to read as follows:
(1) The conditions of probation and conditional discharge shall be such as the court, in
its discretion, deems reasonably necessary to ensure that the defendant will lead a
law-abiding life or to assist him or her to do so. The court shall provide as an
explicit condition of every sentence to probation or conditional discharge that the
defendant not commit another offense during the period for which the sentence
remains subject to revocation.
(2) When imposing a sentence of probation or conditional discharge, the court may, in
addition to any other reasonable condition, require that the defendant:
(a) Avoid injurious or vicious habits;
(b) Avoid persons or places of disreputable or harmful character;
(c) Work faithfully at suitable employment as far as possible;
(d) Undergo available medical or psychiatric treatment and remain in a specific
institution as required for that purpose;
(e) Post a bond, without surety, conditioned on performance of any of the
prescribed conditions;
(f) Support his or her dependents and meet other family responsibilities;
(g) Pay the cost of the proceeding as set by the court;
(h) Remain within a specified area;
Page 27 of 34
XXXX 12/26/2024 10:31 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 920
(i) Report to the probation officer as directed;
(j) Permit the probation officer to visit him or her at his or her home or
elsewhere;
(k) Answer all reasonable inquiries by the probation officer and promptly notify
the probation officer of any change in address or employment;
(l) Submit to periodic testing for the use of [controlled substances or ]alcohol or
controlled substances other than cannabis, if the defendant's record indicates
a controlled substance or alcohol problem, and to pay a reasonable fee, as
determined by the court, which fee shall not exceed the actual cost of the test
and analysis and shall be paid directly to the agency or agencies responsible
for testing and analysis as compensation for the cost of the testing and
analysis, as specified by written order of the court, performed under this
subsection. For good cause shown, the testing fee may be waived by the court;
(m) Use an alcohol monitoring device, as defined in KRS 431.068. All costs
associated with the device, including administrative and operating costs, shall
be paid by the defendant. If the court determines that the defendant is
indigent, and a person, county, or other organization has not agreed to pay the
costs for the defendant in an attempt to reduce incarceration expenses and
increase public safety, the court shall consider other conditions of probation or
conditional discharge provided for in this section;
(n) During all or part of the period of probation or conditional discharge,
participate in a global positioning monitoring system program operated by a
county pursuant to KRS 67.372 and 67.374 under the same terms and
conditions as provided in KRS 431.517; or
(o) Participate in a specific evidence-based program designed to reduce violence.
(3) When imposing a sentence of probation or conditional discharge in a case where a
victim of a crime has suffered monetary damage as a result of the crime due to his
Page 28 of 34
XXXX 12/26/2024 10:31 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 920
or her property having been converted, stolen, or unlawfully obtained, or its value
substantially decreased as a result of the crime, or where the victim suffered actual
medical expenses, direct out-of-pocket losses, or loss of earning as a direct result of
the crime, or where the victim incurred expenses in relocating for the purpose of the
victim's safety or the safety of a member of the victim's household, or if as a direct
result of the crime the victim incurred medical expenses that were paid by the
Cabinet for Health and Family Services, the Crime Victims Compensation Board,
or any other governmental entity, the court shall order the defendant to make
restitution in addition to any other penalty provided for the commission of the
offense. Payment of restitution to the victim shall have priority over payment of
restitution to any government agency. Restitution shall be ordered in the full
amount of the damages, unless the damages exceed one hundred thousand dollars
($100,000) or twice the amount of the gain from the commission of the offense,
whichever is greater, in which case the higher of these two (2) amounts shall be
awarded. The court may, in lieu of ordering monetary restitution, order the
defendant to make restitution by working for or on behalf of the victim. The court
shall determine the number of hours of work necessary by applying the then-
prevailing federal minimum wage to the total amount of monetary damage caused
by or incidental to the commission of the crime. The court may, with the consent of
the agency, order the defendant to work as specified in KRS 533.070. Any work
ordered pursuant to this section shall not be deemed employment for any purpose,
nor shall the person performing the work be deemed an employee for any purpose.
Where there is more than one (1) defendant or more than one (1) victim, restitution
may be apportioned. Restitution shall be subject to the following additional terms
and conditions:
(a) Where property which is unlawfully in the possession of the defendant is in
substantially undamaged condition from its condition at the time of the taking,
Page 29 of 34
XXXX 12/26/2024 10:31 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 920
return of the property shall be ordered in lieu of monetary restitution;
(b) The circuit clerk shall assess an additional fee of five percent (5%) to defray
the administrative costs of collection of payments or property. This fee shall
be paid by the defendant and shall inure to a trust and agency account which
shall not lapse and which shall be used to hire additional deputy clerks and
office personnel or increase deputy clerk or office personnel salaries, or
combination thereof;
(c) When a defendant fails to make restitution ordered to be paid through the
circuit clerk or a court-authorized program run by the county attorney or the
Commonwealth's attorney, the circuit clerk or court-authorized program shall
notify the court; and
(d) An order of restitution shall not preclude the owner of property or the victim
who suffered personal physical or mental injury or out-of-pocket loss of
earnings or support or other damages from proceeding in a civil action to
recover damages from the defendant. A civil verdict shall be reduced by the
amount paid under the criminal restitution order.
(4) When requiring fees for controlled substances or alcohol tests, or other fees and
payments authorized by this section or other statute, except restitution, to be paid by
the defendant, the court shall not order the payments to be paid through the circuit
clerk.
(5) When a defendant is sentenced to probation or conditional discharge, he or she shall
be given a written statement explicitly setting forth the conditions under which he
or she is being released.
(6) When imposing a sentence of probation or conditional discharge, the court, in
addition to conditions imposed under this section, may require as a condition of the
sentence that the defendant submit to a period of imprisonment in the county jail or
to a period of home incarceration at whatever time or intervals, consecutive or
Page 30 of 34
XXXX 12/26/2024 10:31 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 920
nonconsecutive, the court shall determine. The time actually spent in confinement
or home incarceration pursuant to this provision shall not exceed twelve (12)
months or the maximum term of imprisonment assessed pursuant to KRS Chapter
532, whichever is the shorter. Time spent in confinement or home incarceration
under this subsection shall be credited against the maximum term of imprisonment
assessed for the defendant pursuant to KRS Chapter 532, if probation or conditional
discharge is revoked and the defendant is sentenced to imprisonment. Any
prohibitions against probation, shock probation, or conditional discharge under
KRS 533.060(2) or 532.045 shall not apply to persons convicted of a misdemeanor
or Class D felony and sentenced to a period of confinement or home incarceration
under this section.
Section 9. KRS 138.872 is amended to read as follows:
(1) A tax is hereby levied on each offender engaging in a taxable activity in this state.
The tax shall be paid at the following rates:
(a) One thousand dollars ($1,000) per plant, whether growing or detached from
the soil, on each cannabis[marijuana] plant with foliation which exceeds a
personal use quantity of cannabis as defined in Section 2 of this Act;
(b) Three dollars and fifty cents ($3.50) on each gram, or portion thereof, of
cannabis[marijuana] which has been detached from the plant on which it
grew and which exceeds a personal use quantity of cannabis as defined in
Section 2 of this Act;
(c) Two hundred dollars ($200) on each gram, or portion thereof, of controlled
substances; and
(d) Two thousand dollars ($2,000) on each fifty (50) dosage units, or portion
thereof, of a controlled substance that is not sold by weight.
(2) For the purpose of calculating the tax levied pursuant to subsections (1)(b), (1)(c),
and (1)(d) of this section, the quantity shall be measured by the weight of the
Page 31 of 34
XXXX 12/26/2024 10:31 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 920
cannabis[marijuana] or controlled substance, whether pure, impure, or diluted, or
by dosage units when a controlled substance is not sold by weight.
(3) An offender lawfully engaged in a taxable activity shall be exempt from the tax
imposed by this section if the offender is not in violation of any law which
authorizes him or her to engage in the activity.
SECTION 10. A NEW SECTION OF KRS CHAPTER 431 IS CREATED TO
READ AS FOLLOWS:
(1) As used in this section:
(a) "Cannabis accessory" has the same meaning as in Section 2 of this Act;
(b) "Eligible conviction" means any criminal conviction for a violation of
Section 3 of this Act, subsection (2) of Section 4 of this Act, subsection (2)
of Section 5 of this Act, or Section 6 of this Act, or a conviction for an
offense prior to July 14, 1992, for possession, cultivation, or trafficking of
marijuana which was punishable by not more than five (5) years'
incarceration;
(c) "Expungeable conviction" means any eligible conviction for which the
available record does not indicate that the offense involved a quantity of
marijuana in excess of the personal use quantity of cannabis, or, for a
conviction pursuant to Section 6 of this Act, the record does not indicate
that the offense involved drug paraphernalia other than cannabis
accessories; and
(d) "Personal use quantity of cannabis" has the same meaning as in Section 2
of this Act.
(2) The Administrative Office of the Courts shall establish a process for identifying
all eligible convictions and communicating each eligible conviction to the court
in which the conviction occurred, and to the office of the Commonwealth's
attorney or county attorney that prosecuted the case. All eligible convictions shall
Page 32 of 34
XXXX 12/26/2024 10:31 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 920
be communicated to the office of the Commonwealth's attorney or county
attorney that prosecuted the case within ninety (90) days of the effective date of
this Act.
(3) Within ninety (90) days of the receipt of an eligible conviction, the office of the
Commonwealth's attorney or county attorney that prosecuted the case may file
with the court in which the conviction occurred an objection to the expungement
of any eligible conviction which is not an expungeable conviction.
(4) Within two hundred (200) days of the effective date of this Act, for any eligible
conviction to which the office of the Commonwealth's attorney or county attorney
that prosecuted the case has not filed an objection, the court shall order the
judgment vacated, and dismiss with prejudice any charges which are eligible for
expungement under this section, and order expunged all records in the custody of
the court and any records in the custody of any other agency or official, including
law enforcement records.
(5) (a) Any person who has an eligible conviction prior to the effective date of this
Act and whose records have not been expunged pursuant to subsection (4)
of this section may at any time after one (1) year after the effective date of
this Act petition the court in which the conviction occurred to expunge all
eligible convictions.
(b) There shall be no filing fee for a petition pursuant to this subsection.
(c) An expungement petition brought under this subsection shall be served
upon the offices of the county and Commonwealth's attorneys that
prosecuted the case, and the court shall notify the county and
Commonwealth's attorneys of an opportunity for a response to the petition.
The response shall be filed within ninety (90) days after the filing of the
petition.
(d) If a response is not filed, ninety (90) days after the filing of the petition the
Page 33 of 34
XXXX 12/26/2024 10:31 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 920
court shall order the judgment vacated, and dismiss with prejudice any
charges which are eligible for expungement under this section.
(e) If a response is filed objecting to the expungement of the eligible conviction,
the court shall within ninety (90) days of the receipt of the objection
schedule a hearing on the petition. If, at the hearing, the court finds that the
eligible conviction is an expungeable conviction, the court shall order the
judgment vacated, and dismiss with prejudice any charges which are
eligible for expungement under this section.
(6) Upon entry of an order vacating and expunging a conviction, the original
conviction shall be vacated and the record shall be expunged. The court and
other agencies shall cause records to be deleted or removed from their computer
systems so that the matter shall not appear on official state-performed
background checks. The court and other agencies shall reply to any inquiry that
no record exists on the matter. The person whose record is expunged shall not
have to disclose the fact of the record or any matter relating thereto on an
application for employment, credit, or other type of application. If the expunged
conviction was a felony, and the person is not prohibited from voting for any
other reason, the person's ability to vote shall be restored and the person may
register to vote.
(7) The Administrative Office of the Courts shall, by December 1, 2026, submit a
report to the Legislative Research Commission for referral to the Interim Joint
Committee on Judiciary, providing data by county on the numbers of eligible
convictions identified, objections filed with the court, and the number of
expungements granted.
(8) This section shall be retroactive.
Page 34 of 34
XXXX 12/26/2024 10:31 AM Jacketed